North Carolina statutes. Chapter 75. Monopolies, Trusts and Consumer Protection.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 75-28.
Unauthorized disclosure of tax information; violation a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Except in accordance with proper judicial order, or as otherwise provided by law, it shall be unlawful for any person, firm or corporation employed or engaged to prepare, or who or which prepares or undertakes to prepare, for any other person or taxpayer any tax form, report or return, to disclose, divulge or make known in any manner or use for any purpose or in any manner other than in the preparation of such form, report or return, without the express consent of the taxpayer or person for whom the form or return is prepared, the name or address of the taxpayer or such other person, the amount of income, income tax or other taxes, or any other information shown on or included in such form, report or return, or any information which may be or may have been furnished by the taxpayer or such other person to the preparer of such form, report or return or to the person, firm or corporation so employed or engaged.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the examination of any person, books, papers, records or other data in accordance with the authority provided in

G.S. 105-258

.

Any person, firm or corporation, or any officer, agent, clerk, employee, or former officer or employee, of any firm or corporation engaged or formerly engaged in the preparation of tax forms, reports or returns for others, whether acting for himself or as agent for such corporation, who or which shall violate the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1971, c. 231; 1993, c. 485, s. 32; c. 539, s. 561; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 14, s. 43; c. 24, s. 14(c).

Legal Periodicals.

For article on antitrust and unfair trade practice law in North Carolina, with federal law compared, see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 199 (1972).

§ 75-29.
Unfair and deceptive trade names; use of term “wholesale” in advertising, etc.

No person, firm or corporation shall advertise the sale of its merchandise using the term “wholesale” with regard to its sale prices, except as such word may appear in the company or firm name, unless such advertised sale or sales is, or are, to a customer or customers having a certificate of resale issued pursuant to

G.S. 105-164.28

and recorded as required by G.S. 105-164.25 or unless the wholesale price is established by an independent agency not engaged in the manufacture, distribution or sale of such merchandise.No person, firm or corporation shall utilize in any commercial transaction a company or firm name which contains the word “wholesale” unless such person, firm or corporation is engaged principally in sales at wholesale as defined in

G.S. 105-164.3

. For the purposes of determining whether sales are made principally at wholesale or retail, all sales to employees of any such person, firm or corporation, all sales to organizations subject to refunds pursuant to

G.S. 105-164.14

through

G.S. 105-164.14

B and all exempt sales pursuant to

G.S. 105-164.13

shall be considered sales at wholesale. Sales of merchandise for delivery by the seller to the purchaser at a location other than the seller’s place of business shall be considered sales at wholesale for the purposes of this section.

The violation of any provision of this section shall be considered an unfair trade practice, as prohibited by

G.S. 75-1.1

.

This section shall not apply to the sales of farm products, fertilizers, insecticides, pesticides or petroleum.

History.

1973, c. 1392, ss. 1, 2; 2010-166, s. 3.1.

§§ 75-30,
75-30.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2003-411, ss. 1, 2, effective October 1, 2003, and applicable to telephone solicitations made on or after that date.

Cross References.

As to present provisions pertaining to consumer protections from unwanted telephone solicitations, see

G.S. 75-100

et seq.

§ 75-31.
Work-at-home solicitations.

No person, firm, association, or corporation shall advertise, represent, or imply that any person can earn money by stuffing envelopes, addressing envelopes, mailing circulars, clipping newspaper and magazine articles, or performing similar work, unless the person, firm, association or corporation making the advertisement or representation:

Actually pays a wage, salary, set fee, or commission to others for performing the represented tasks; and

At no time requires the person who will perform the represented tasks to purchase from or make a deposit to the solicitor on any instructional booklets, brochures, kits, programs or similar information materials, mailing lists, directories, memberships in cooperative associations, or other items or services.

History.

1979, c. 724, s. 1.

§ 75-32.
Representation of winning a prize.

No person, firm or corporation engaged in commerce shall, in connection with the sale or lease or solicitation for the sale or lease of any goods, property, or service, represent that any other person, firm or corporation has won anything of value or is the winner of any contest, unless all of the following conditions are met:

The recipient of the prize must have been selected by a method in which no more than ten percent (10%) of the names considered are selected as winners of any prize;

The recipient of the prize must be given the prize without any obligation; and

The prize must be delivered to the recipient at no expense to him, within 10 days of the representation.

The use of any language that has a tendency to lead a reasonable person to believe he has won a contest or anything of value, including but not limited to “congratulations,” and “you are entitled to receive,” shall be considered a representation of the type governed by this section.

History.

1979, c. 879, s. 1.

§ 75-33.
Representation of eligibility to win a prize.

No person, firm or corporation engaged in commerce shall, in connection with the sale or lease or solicitation for sale or lease of any goods, property or service, represent that another person, firm, and/or corporation has a chance to receive any prize or item of value without clearly disclosing on whose behalf the contest or promotion is conducted, and all material conditions which a participant must meet. Additionally, each of the following must be clearly and prominently disclosed immediately adjacent to the description of the item or prize to which it relates:

The actual retail value of each item or prize (the price at which substantial sales of the item were made in the area within the last 90 days, or if no substantial sales were made, the actual cost of the item or prize to the person on whose behalf the contest or promotion is conducted);

The actual number of each item or prize to be awarded;

The odds of receiving each item or prize.It shall be unlawful to make any representation of the type governed by this section, if it has already been determined which items will be given to the person to whom the representation is made.

The provisions of this section shall not apply where (i) all that is asked of participants is that they complete and mail, or deposit at a local retail commercial establishment, an entry blank obtainable locally or by mail, or call in their entry by telephone, and (ii) at no time are participants asked to listen to a sales presentation.

To the extent that representations of the type governed by this section are broadcast by radio or television or carried by cable-television, the required disclosures need not be made, if the required information is made available to interested persons on request without charge or cost to them.

Nothing in this section shall create any liability for acts by the publisher, owner, agent or employee of a newspaper, periodical, radio station, television station, cable-television system or other advertising medium arising out of the publication or dissemination of any advertisement or promotion governed by this section, when the publisher, owner, agent or employee did not know that the advertisement or promotion violated the requirements of this section.

History.

1979, c. 879, s. 1; 1981, c. 806; 1983, c. 721, s. 3.

§ 75-34.
Representation of being specially selected.

No person, firm or corporation engaged in commerce shall represent that any other person, firm or corporation has been specially selected in connection with the sale or lease or solicitation for sale or lease of any goods, property, or service, unless all of the following conditions are met:

The selection process is designed to reach a particular type or particular types of person, firm or corporation;

The selection process uses a source other than telephone directories, city directories, tax listings, voter registration records, purchased mailing lists, or similar common sources of names;

No more than ten percent (10%) of those considered are selected.

The use of any language that has a tendency to lead a reasonable person to believe he has been specially selected, including but not limited to “carefully selected” and “you have been chosen,” shall be considered a representation of the type governed by this selection [section].

History.

1979, c. 879, s. 1.

§ 75-35.
Simulation of checks and invoices.

No person engaged in commerce shall in any manner issue any writing which simulates or resembles: (i) a negotiable instrument; or (ii) an invoice, unless the intended recipient has actually contracted for goods, property, or services for which the issuer seeks proper payment.

History.

1979, c. 879, s. 1.

§ 75-36.
Certain contracts relating to toner or inkjet cartridges void and unenforceable as a matter of public policy.

Any provision in any agreement or contract that prohibits the reusing, remanufacturing, or refilling of a toner or inkjet cartridge is void and unenforceable as a matter of public policy. Nothing in this section shall prevent any maintenance contract that warrants the performance of equipment under the contract from requiring the use of new or specified toner or inkjet cartridges in the equipment under contract.

History.

2003-386, s. 1.

§ 75-37.
Declaration of State public policy.

It is the public policy of this State to protect its citizens from price gouging during states of disaster. The State also realizes the difficulty in regulating prices while not defeating the ability of the market in goods and services from bringing supply back in balance with demand and not defeating the function of price in allocating scarce resources.

History.

2003-412, s. 1.

§ 75-38.
Prohibit excessive pricing during states of disaster, states of emergency, or abnormal market disruptions.

Upon a triggering event, it is prohibited and shall be a violation of

G.S. 75-1.1

for any person to sell or rent or offer to sell or rent any goods or services which are consumed or used as a direct result of an emergency or which are consumed or used to preserve, protect, or sustain life, health, safety, or economic well-being of persons or their property with the knowledge and intent to charge a price that is unreasonably excessive under the circumstances. This prohibition shall apply to all parties in the chain of distribution, including, but not limited to, a manufacturer, supplier, wholesaler, distributor, or retail seller of goods or services. This prohibition shall apply in the area where the state of disaster or emergency has been declared or the abnormal market disruption has been found.In determining whether a price is unreasonably excessive, it shall be considered whether:

The price charged by the seller is attributable to additional costs imposed by the seller’s supplier or other costs of providing the good or service during the triggering event.

The price charged by the seller exceeds the seller’s average price in the preceding 60 days before the triggering event. If the seller did not sell or rent or offer to sell or rent the goods or service in question prior to the time of the triggering event, the price at which the goods or service was generally available in the trade area shall be used as a factor in determining if the seller is charging an unreasonably excessive price.

The price charged by the seller is attributable to fluctuations in applicable commodity markets; fluctuations in applicable regional, national, or international market trends; or to reasonable expenses and charges for attendant business risk incurred in procuring or selling the goods or services.

In the event the Attorney General investigates a complaint for a violation of this section and determines that the seller has not violated the provisions of this section and if the seller so requests, the Attorney General shall promptly issue a signed statement indicating that the Attorney General has not found a violation of this section.

For the purposes of this section, the end of a triggering event is the earlier of 45 days after the triggering event occurs or the expiration or termination of the triggering event unless the prohibition is specifically extended by the Governor.

A “triggering event” means the declaration of a state of emergency pursuant to Article 1A of Chapter 166A of the General Statutes or a finding of abnormal market disruption pursuant to

G.S. 75-38(e)

.

An “abnormal market disruption” means a significant disruption, whether actual or imminent, to the production, distribution, or sale of goods and services in North Carolina, which are consumed or used as a direct result of an emergency or used to preserve, protect, or sustain life, health, safety, or economic well-being of a person or his or her property. A significant disruption may result from a natural disaster, weather, acts of nature, strike, power or energy failures or shortages, civil disorder, war, terrorist attack, national or local emergency, or other extraordinary adverse circumstances. A significant market disruption can be found only if a declaration of a state of emergency, state of disaster, or similar declaration is made by the President of the United States or an issuance of Code Red/Severe Risk of Attack in the Homeland Security Advisory System is made by the Department of Homeland Security, whether or not such declaration or issuance applies to North Carolina.

The existence of an abnormal market disruption shall be found and declared by the Governor pursuant to the definition in subsection (e) of this section. The duration of an abnormal market disruption shall be 45 days from the triggering event, but may be renewed by the Governor if the Governor finds and declares the disruption continues to affect the economic well-being of North Carolinians beyond the initial 45-day period.

History.

2003-412, s. 1; 2006-245, s. 1; 2006-259, s. 41; 2012-12, s. 2(o).

§ 75-39.
Conditioning services on electric service prohibited.

No municipality or other provider of water or sewer services may offer, or agree to provide, extend, enhance, or accelerate the provision of water or sewer services, or facilities or other municipal services or facilities, to any person in consideration of that person or another person agreeing to receive electric service from the municipality or another electric supplier.

No municipality or other provider of water or sewer services may refuse to provide, or threaten or act to deny, delay, or terminate the provision of, water or sewer services or facilities, or other municipal services or facilities, to any person as a result of, or in an attempt to influence, the choice of an electric supplier by that person or another person.

A violation of this section by any municipality or other provider of water or sewer services shall constitute an unfair method of competition and an unfair act or practice under

G.S. 75-1.1

.

History.

2005-150, s. 1.

§ 75-40.
Deadline for mailing consumer rebates.

Any person, firm, or corporation engaged in commerce that offers a rebate shall provide the rebate to the consumer within 60 days of the date of receipt by the person, firm, or corporation of the completed rebate form submitted by the consumer. If the rebate claim is submitted electronically, the rebate shall be provided to the consumer within 60 days of the date upon which the claim is submitted. However, a person, firm, or corporation shall not be responsible for delays in providing rebates to consumers caused by conditions beyond their reasonable control including, but not limited to, natural disasters, wars, terrorist acts, and states of emergency. As used in this section, the following apply:

The term “rebate” means the return of a portion of the purchase price paid by a consumer for goods or services that is conditioned upon the consumer submitting a request for redemption after satisfying the terms and conditions of the offer.

The term “rebate” shall not include any refund that may be given to a consumer in accordance with a company’s frequent shopper customer rewards program.

The term “consumer” does not apply to those individuals who are eligible for rebates as result of their eligibility under Medicaid.

Rebate forms shall include the telephone number or e-mail address of the person, firm, or corporation that is offering the rebate. Rebate forms shall also include all of the following conspicuously printed on the rebate form:

The terms of the rebate.

Requirements for a valid claim, including any additional information to be submitted with the rebate form.

The expiration date of the rebate offer, if applicable.

A rebate offer shall provide a period of at least 30 days during which the consumer may submit the rebate form. The time period allowed for submission shall begin as soon as reasonably possible, but no later than six months, after the date of purchase.

Nothing in this section shall apply to a rebate offer of five dollars ($5.00) or less.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to create liability on the part of a retailer for a rebate offered by a manufacturer or liability on the part of a manufacturer for a rebate offered by a retailer.

A violation of this section is an unfair trade practice under

G.S. 75-1.1

and is subject to all of the enforcement and penalty provisions of an unfair trade practice under this Article.

History.

2007-170, s. 1.

§ 75-41.
Contracts with automatic renewal clauses.

Any person engaged in commerce that sells, leases, or offers to sell or lease, any products or services to a consumer pursuant to a contract, where the contract automatically renews unless the consumer cancels the contract, shall do all of the following:

Disclose the automatic renewal clause clearly and conspicuously in the contract or contract offer.

Disclose clearly and conspicuously how to cancel the contract in the initial contract, contract offer, or with delivery of products or services.

For any automatic renewal exceeding 60 days, provide written notice to the consumer by personal delivery, electronic mail, or first-class mail, at least 15 days but no earlier than 45 days before the date the contract is to be automatically renewed, stating the date on which the contract is scheduled to automatically renew and notifying the consumer that the contract will automatically renew unless it is cancelled by the consumer prior to that date.

If the terms of the contract will change upon the automatic renewal of the contract, disclose the changing terms of the contract clearly and conspicuously on the notification in at least 12 point type and in bold print.

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-113, s. 16(a), effective July 26, 2016, and applicable to contracts entered into on or after that date.

A person that fails to comply with the requirements of this section is in violation of this section unless the person demonstrates that all of the following are its routine business practice:

The person has established and implemented written procedures to comply with this section and enforces compliance with the procedures.

Any failure to comply with this section is the result of error.

Where an error has caused the failure to comply with this section, the person provides a full refund or credit for all amounts billed to or paid by the consumer from the date of the renewal until the date of the termination of the contract, or the date of the subsequent notice of renewal, whichever occurs first.

This section does not apply to insurers licensed under Chapter 58 of the General Statutes, or to banks, trust companies, savings and loan associations, savings banks, or credit unions licensed or organized under the laws of any state or the United States, or any foreign bank maintaining a branch or agency licensed under the laws of the United States, or any subsidiary or affiliate thereof, nor does this section apply to any entity subject to regulation by the Federal Communications Commission under Title 47 of the United States Code or by the North Carolina Utilities Commission under Chapter 62 of the General Statutes, or to any entity doing business directly or through an affiliate pursuant to a franchise, license, certificate, or other authorization issued by a political subdivision of the State or an agency thereof.

(d1)

This section does not apply to real estate professionals licensed under Chapter 93A of the General Statutes.

A violation of this section renders the automatic renewal clause void and unenforceable.

History.

2007-288, s. 1; 2007-507, s. 17; 2016-113, s. 16(a); 2018-114, s. 4(a).

§ 75-42.
Deceptive representation of geographical location in telephone directory, print advertisement, or on the Internet.

A person who is in the business of supplying a perishable product shall not misrepresent the geographical location of the business in the listing of the business in a telephone directory, other directory assistance database, or on the Internet. A person misrepresents the geographical location of the business under this subsection if the name of the business, or any other part of the listing, indicates that the business is located in a geographical area and all of the following apply:

The business is not located within the geographical area indicated.

The listing fails to identify the municipality and state of the business’s geographical location.

A telephone call to the local telephone number listed in the telephone directory, directory assistance database, or on the Internet routinely is forwarded or transferred to a location that is outside the calling area covered by the telephone directory or directory assistance database in which the number is listed, or outside the local calling area for the local telephone number posted on the Internet.

A person who is in the business of supplying a perishable product shall not misrepresent the geographical location of the business in print advertisement. A person misrepresents the geographical location of the business under this subsection if a fictitious business name, an assumed business name, or any other part of the advertisement is listed in print advertisement and all of the following apply:

The name or any other part of the advertisement misrepresents the geographic location of the supplier.

A telephone call to the local telephone number listed on the print advertisement routinely is forwarded or transferred to a location that is outside the calling area in which the number is listed.

A person who misrepresents the geographical location of the business under subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section is not in violation of this section if a conspicuous notice in the listing or in the print advertisement states the municipality and state in which the business is located and identifies this as the location of the business.

For purposes of this section, a newspaper publisher, magazine or other publication, telephone directory or directory assistance service, its officer or agent, the owner or operator of a radio or television station, or any other owner or operator of a media primarily devoted to listing phone numbers or to advertising who publishes, broadcasts, or otherwise disseminates a directory, a database, or print advertisement in good faith without knowledge of its false, deceptive, or misleading character is immune from liability under this section unless the directory service, the database service, or the advertiser is the same person as the person, firm, or corporation that has committed the act prohibited by this section.

A violation of this section is an unfair trade practice under

G.S. 75-1.1

.

History.

2007-545, s. 1; 2009-199, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-199, s. 1, effective October 1, 2009, in subsection (a), in the introductory paragraph, substituted “the business, or any other part of the listing,” for “the business”; in subsection (b), in the introductory paragraph, substituted “business name, an assumed business name, or any other part of the advertisement” for “business name or an assumed business name”; and in subdivision (b)(1), inserted “or any other part of the advertisement.”

§ 75-43.
Solicitation of a fee for copy of recorded documents.

Any person, firm, or corporation soliciting a fee in exchange for providing a copy of a record available at the register of deeds office shall state on the top of the document used for the solicitation, in conspicuous type, all of the following:

That the solicitation is not from a State agency or a local unit of government.

That no action is legally required by the person being solicited.

The fee for obtaining a copy of the record directly from the register of deeds that has custody of the record.

The information necessary to contact the register of deeds that has custody of the record.

The name and physical address of the person, firm, or corporation soliciting the fee.

A document used for a solicitation governed by this section shall not contain deadline dates or be in a form or contain language designed to make the document appear to be issued by a State agency or local unit of government or to appear to impose a legal duty on the person being solicited.

A person, firm, or corporation soliciting a fee in exchange for providing a copy of a record may not charge a fee that is greater than four times the amount the register of deeds with custody of the record would charge for a copy of the same record.

A violation of this section constitutes an unfair trade practice under

G.S. 75-1.1

and is subject to all of the enforcement and penalty provisions under this Article.

For the purposes of this section, the term “solicit” means to advertise or market to a nonbusiness entity with whom the solicitor has no preexisting business relationship.

History.

2018-80, s. 3.1; 2020-50, s. 3(a).

§§ 75-44 through 75-49.

Reserved for future codification purposes.